District of Columbia statutes.
50-2101

Vehicle cover requirement; penalty.

(a)

No person shall operate any vehicle on the public roadways of the District of Columbia carrying loose debris or loose cargo that could be dislodged from the vehicle without covering and restraining the loose debris or loose cargo so as to render the material immobile. The provisions of this section shall not apply when loose debris or loose cargo is loaded so that the height of the cargo against the sides of the vehicle container does not extend above a point 6 inches below the top of the vehicle container and no portion of the load extends above the top of the vehicle container.

(b)

The penalty for violating this section shall be a civil fine not to exceed $500.

(c)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to repeal the requirements or penalties provided in 18 DCMR 2503.2, 20 DCMR 605.1(c), and 24 DCMR 1007.

May 10, 1988, D.C. Law 7-108, § 2, 35 DCR 2179
1981 Ed., § 40-499.1.
Criminal procedure, warrantless arrests, see § 23-581.